District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.35

Applicability of other provisions of law.

Except to the extent specifically provided in this part, those provisions of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, including the amendments made by that Act, and all other provisions of law relating to Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, shall apply to the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions established pursuant to the provisions of this part.

June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 6, 23 DCR 577
1981 Ed., § 1-269.
1973 Ed., § 1-171q.
The Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, referred to in this section, is the Act of October 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21.